Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF55.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1782XS (3) 91 th/ns S.F. 55 Section 1. Section 321.34, subsection 10, paragraph a, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. Upon application and payment of the proper fees, the 3 director may issue fire fighter plates to the owner of a 4 motor vehicle subject to registration under section 321.109, 5 subsection 1 , autocycle, motor truck, motor home, multipurpose 6 vehicle, motorcycle, trailer, or travel trailer if the owner 7 is a current or retired member of a paid or volunteer fire 8 department , or if the owner is a revocable trust, as defined 9 in section 9H.1, and the grantor, as defined in section 9H.1, 10 is a current or retired member of a paid or volunteer fire 11 department . The special registration plates, designed by the 12 department in cooperation with representatives designated 13 by the Iowa fire fightersâ associations, signify that the 14 applicant is a current or retired member of a paid or volunteer 15 fire department. 16